en: E556, Calcium aluminium silicate, Calcium aluminosilicate, Calcium silicoaluminate, Aluminium calcium silicate
xx: E556
bg: E556, Калциевоалуминиев силикат, Калциев алуминосиликат, калциев силикоалуминат
ca: E556, Silicat de calci i alumini
cs: E556, Křemičitan vápenato-hlinitý
da: E556, Calciumaluminiumsilicat
de: E556, Calciumaluminiumsilicat, Calciumaluminosilicat, Calciumsilicoaluminat
el: E556, Πυριτικο αργιλιασβεστιο, Αργιλοπυριτικό ασβέστιο
es: E556, Silicato de calcio y aluminio, Aluminosilicato de calcio, silicoaluminato de calcio
et: E556, Kaltsiumalumiiniumsilikaat
fi: E556, Kalsiumalumiinisilikaatti, Kalsiumpiialuminaatti
fr: E556, Silicate alumino-calcique, Silicate double d'aluminium et de calcium, Silicate d'aluminium et calcium, Calcium Aluminum Silicate, Aluminosilicate de calcium, Silicoaluminate de calcium, Silicate d'aluminium et de calcium, Silicate double de calcium et d'aluminium
hu: E556, Kalcium-alumínium-szilikát, Kalcium-aluminoszilikát, Kalcium-szilikoaluminát
it: E556, Calcium aluminium silicate, Alluminosilicato di calcio, silicoalluminato di calcio
lt: E556, Kalcio aliuminio silikatas, Kalcio aliuminosilikatas, kalcio silikoaliuminatas
lv: E556, Kalcija alumīnija silikāts, Kalcija aluminosilikāts, kalcija silikoalumināts
mt: E556, Silikat tal-kalċju u tal-aluminju, Aluminosilikat tal-kalċju, Silikoaluminat tal-kalċju
nl: E556, Calciumaluminiumsilicaat, Calciumaluminosilicaat, calciumsilicoaluminaat
pl: E556, Krzemian glinowo-wapniowy, Glinokrzemian wapnia, krzemoglinian wapnia
pt: E556, Silicato de alumínio e cálcio, Aluminossilicato de cálcio, silicoaluminato de cálcio
ro: E556, Silicat de aluminiu și calciu, Aluminosilicat de calciu, Silicoaluminat de calciu
sk: E556, Kremičitan hlinitovápenatý, Hlinitokremičitan vápenatý, kremičitohlinitan vápenatý
sl: E556, Kalcijev aluminijev silikat, kalcijev aluminosilikat, kalcijev silikoaluminat
sv: E556, Kalciumaluminiumsilikat

en: E557, hemimorphite, calamine
xx: E557
ca: E557, Hemimorfita
de: E557, Hemimorphit, Kieselzinkerz
el: E557, Ημιμορφίτης
es: E557, Hemimorfita
fi: E557, Hemimorfiitti, Hemimorfiittia
fr: E557, Silicate de zinc, Hémimorphite, Zinc oxydé silicifère, Oxyde de zinc silicifère, Wagite
hu: E557, hemimorfit, kalamin
it: E557, Emimorfite
nl: E557, Zinksilicaat, hemimorfiet
pl: E557, Hemimorfit, Kalamin
pt: E557, Hemimorfita, Hemimorfite
sl: E557, Hemimorfit
sv: E557, Kiselgalmeja, Hemimorfit

en: E558, Bentonite
xx: E558, 1m558i, 1m558
af: E558, Bentoniet
ar: E558, بنتونيت
az: E558, Bentonit
bg: E558, Бентонит
ca: E558, Bentonita
cs: E558, Bentonit, E 558
da: E558, Bentonit
de: E558, Bentonit, E 558
el: E558, Μπεντονίτης
eo: E558, Bentonito
es: E558, Bentonita
et: E558, Bentoniit
fa: E558, بنتونیت
fi: E558, Bentoniitti, Bentoniittia
fr: E558, Bentonite, E-558
gl: E558, Bentonita
he: E558, בנטוניט
hi: E558, बेंटोनाइट
hr: E558, Bentonit
hu: E558, Bentonit
id: E558, Bentonit
is: E558, Bentónít
it: E558, Bentonite
ja: E558, ベントナイト
ko: E558, 벤토나이트
lt: E558, Bentonitas
lv: E558, Bentonīts
mk: E558, Бентонит
ms: E558, Bentonit
mt: E558, Bentonit
nl: E558, Bentoniet, Vollersaarde
no: E558, Bentonitt
pl: E558, Bentonit
pt: E558, Bentonita, Bentonite
ro: E558, Bentonit
ru: E558, Бентонит
sk: E558, Bentonit
sl: E558, Bentonit
sq: E558, Bentonit
sr: E558, Бентонит
sv: E558, Bentonit, E 558, Bentonitlera
th: E558, เบนโทไนต์
tr: E558, Bentonit
uk: E558, Бентоніт
vi: E558, Bentonit
zh: E558, 膨润土

en: E559, Aluminium silicate, Kaolin
xx: E559
bg: E559, Алуминиев силикат, Каолин
ca: E559, Silicat d'alumini, Caolí, caoli
cs: E559, Křemičitan hlinitý, Hydratovaný křemičitan hlinitý, kaolin
da: E559, Aluminiumsilicat, Kaolin
de: E559, Aluminiumsilicat, Kaolin
el: E559, Πυριτικο αργιλιο, Καολίνης
es: E559, Silicato de aluminio, Caolín
et: E559, Alumiiniumsilikaat, Kerge kaoliin
fi: E559, Alumiinisilikaatti, Kaoliini, Alumiinisilikaattia, Kaoliinia
fr: E559, Silicate d'aluminium, Kaolin, Kaolinite, Argilie kaolinitique, Argile de porcelaine, Argile de Chine, Bentone, CI 7704, CAS 1332-58-7, Silicate d'aluminium (kaolin)
hu: E559, Alumínium-szilikát, Kaolin
it: E559, Silicato di alluminio, Caolino
lt: E559, Aliuminio silikatas, kaolinas
lv: E559, Alumīnija silikāts (kaolīns), Kaolīns
mt: E559, Silikat tal-aluminju, Kaolin
nl: E559, Aluminiumsilicaat, Kaolien
pl: E559, Krzemian glinu, Kaolin
pt: E559, Silicato de alumínio, Caulino
ro: E559, Silicat de aluminiu, Caolin
sk: E559, Kremičitan hlinitý, kaolín
sl: E559, Aluminijev silikat, kaolin
sv: E559, Aluminiumsilikat, Kaolin

en: E560, Potassium silicate
xx: E560
ar: E560, سيليكات البوتاسيوم
az: E560, Kalium silikat
bg: E560, Калиев силикат
ca: E560, Silicat de potassi
de: E560, Kaliumsilicat, Kaliumsilikat
el: E560, Πυριτικό κάλιο
es: E560, Silicato de potasio
et: E560, Kaaliumsilikaat
fi: E560, Kaliumsilikaatti, Kaliumsilikaattia
fr: E560, Silicate de potassium, 1312-76-1, K2O8S2, K2O5Si2
hu: E560, Kálium-szilikát
it: E560, Silicato di potassio
ja: E560, ケイ酸カリウム
ko: E560, 규산 칼륨
lt: E560, Kalio silikatas
lv: E560, Kālija silikāts
mt: E560, Silikat tal-potassju
nl: E560, Kaliumsilicaat
pl: E560, Krzemian potasu
pt: E560, Silicato de potássio
ro: E560, Silicat de potasiu
ru: E560, Силикат калия
sl: E560, Kalijev silikat
tr: E560, Potasyum silikat
uk: E560, Силікат калію
zh: E560, 硅酸钾

en: E570, Fatty acids, Linear fatty acids, caprylic acid (C8), caprylic acid, capric acid (C10), capric acid, lauric acid (C12), lauric acid, myristic acid (C14), myristic acid, palmitic acid (C16), palmitic acid, stearic acid (C18), stearic acid, fatty acid
xx: E570
bg: E570, Мастни киселини, Мастна киселина
ca: E570, Àcid gras, acid gras
cs: E570, Mastné kyseliny, Mastné kyseliny s rovným, nerozvětveným řetězcem, kyselina kaprylová (C8), kyselina kaprinová (C10), kyselina laurová (C12), kyselina myristová (C14), kyselina palmitová (C16), kyselina stearová (C18), Mastná kyselina, Nenasycené mastné kyseliny, Nenasycená mastná kyselina, E 570
da: E570, Fedtsyrer, Lineære fedtsyrer, caprylsyre (C8), caprinsyre (C10), laurinsyre (C12), myristinsyre (C14), palmitinsyre (C16), stearinsyre (C18), Fedtsyre, Enbasisk syre
de: E570, Speisefettsäuren, Fettsäuren, Ungesättigte Fettsäure, Fettsäuremuster, Essentielle Fettsäure, Gesättigte Fettsäure, Fettsäure, E 570
el: E570, Λιπαρα οξεα, Λιπαρά οξέα με ευθεία αλυσίδα, καπρυλικό οξύ (C8), καπρικό οξύ (C10), λαυρικό οξύ (C12), μυριστικό οξύ (C14), παλμιτικό οξύ (C16), στεατικό οξύ (C18), Λιπαρό οξύ
es: E570, Ácidos grasos, Ácidos grasos lineales, ácido caprílico (C8), ácido cáprico (C10), ácido láurico (C12), ácido mirístico (C14), ácido palmítico (C16), ácido esteárico (C18), Ácido graso
et: E570, Rasvhapped, Kaprüülhape (C8), kapr(iin)hape (C10), laur(iin)hape (C12), mürist(iin)hape (C14), palmit(iin)hape (C16), stear(iin)hape (C18)
fi: E570, Rasvahapot, Suoraketjuiset rasvahapot, kapryylihappo (C8), kapriinihappo (C10), lauriinihappo (C12), myristiinihappo (C14), palmitiinihappo (C16), steariinihappo (C18), Rasvahappo, Rasvahappoja, Suoraketjuisia rasvahappoja, kapryylihappoa (C8), kapriinihappoa (C10), lauriinihappoa (C12), myristiinihappoa (C14), palmitiinihappoa (C16), steariinihappoa (C18), Rasvahappoa
fr: E570, Acide stéarique, Stéarine, acides gras, Acide octanoïque, Acide décanoïque, Acide dodécanoïque, Acide tétradécanoïque, Acide hexadécanoïque, Acide octadécanoïque, Acide cis-9-octadécénoïque, Acides gras linéaires, acide caprylique (C8), acide caprique (C10), acide laurique (C12), acide myristique (C14), acide palmitique (C16), acide stéarique (C18), Acide gras
hu: E570, Zsírsavak, Lineáris zsírsavak, kaprilsav (C8), kaprinsav (C10), laurinsav (C12), mirisztinsav (C14), palmitinsav (C16), sztearinsav (C18)
it: E570, Acidi grassi, Acido grasso, NEFA, Grasso saturo, Grassi saturi, Acidi grassi liberi
lt: E570, Riebalų rūgštys, Linijinės riebalų rūgštys, oktano rūgštis (C8), dekano rūgštis (C10), lauro rūgštis (C12), miristo rūgštis (C14), palmitino rūgštis (C16), stearino rūgštis (C18), Riebiosos rūgštys, Riebalinės rūgštys, Riebalų rūgštis, Riebiosios rūgštys
lv: E570, Taukskābes, Lineārās taukskābes, kaprilskābe (C8), kaprīnskābe (C10), laurīnskābe (C12), miristīnskābe (C14), palmitīnskābe (C16), stearīnskābe (C18), Taukskābe
mt: E570, Aċidi grassi, Aċidi grassi lineari, aċidu kapriliku (C8), aċidu kapriku (C10), aċidu lawriku (C12), aċidu miristiku (C14), aċidu palmitiku (C16), aċidu steariku (C18)
nl: E570, Vetzuren, Stearinezuur, vetzuur
pl: E570, Kwasy tłuszczowe, Liniowe kwasy tłuszczowe, kwas kaprylowy (C8), kwas kaprynowy (C10), kwas laurynowy (C12), kwas mirystynowy (C14), kwas palmitynowy (C16), kwas stearynowy (C18), Kwas tłuszczowy
pt: E570, Ácidos gordos, Ácidos gordos de cadeia linear, ácido caprílico (C8), ácido cáprico (C10), ácido láurico (C12), ácido mirístico (C14), ácido palmítico (C16), ácido esteárico (C18), Ácido graxo, Ácido graxo de cadeia muito longa, Ácidos graxos, Ácido gordo, Ácidos graxos essenciais
ro: E570, Acizi grași, Acizi grași lineari, acid caprilic (C8), acid capric (C10), acid lauric (C12), acid miristic (C14), acid palmitic (C16), acid stearic (C18), Acid gras
sk: E570, Mastné kyseliny, Mastná kyselina
sl: E570, Maščobne kisline, linearne maščobne kisline, kaprilna kislina (C8), kaprinska kislina (C10), lavrinska kislina (C12), miristinska kislina (C14), palmitinska kislina (C16), stearinska kislina (C18), Maščobna kislina
sv: E570, Fettsyror, Ogrenade fettsyror, kaprylsyra (C8), kaprinsyra (C10), laurinsyra (C12), myristinsyra (C14), palmitinsyra (C16), stearinsyra (C18), Fettsyra, E 570

en: E571
xx: E571
af: E571, Ammoniumstearaat
ar: E571, ستيرات الأمونيوم
az: E571, Ammonium stearat
bg: E571, Амониев стеарат
ca: E571, Estearat d'amoni
cs: E571, Stearát amonný
da: E571, Ammoniumstearat
de: E571, Ammoniumstearat
el: E571, Στεατικό αμμώνιο
eo: E571, Amonia stearato
es: E571, Estearato de amonio
et: E571, Ammooniumstearaat
fa: E571, آمونیوم استئارات
fi: E571, Ammoniumstearaatti, Ammoniumstearaattia
fr: E571, Stéarate d'ammonium
gl: E571, Estearato de amonio
he: E571, סטארט אמוניום
hi: E571, अमोनियम स्टीयरेट
hr: E571, Amonijev stearat
hu: E571, ammónium-sztearát
id: E571, Amonium stearat
it: E571, Stearato di ammonio
ja: E571, ステアリン酸アンモニウム
ko: E571, 스테아르산 암모늄
lt: E571, Amonio stearatas
lv: E571, Amonija stearāts
mk: E571, Амониум стеарат
mt: E571, Stearat tal-ammonju
nl: E571, Ammoniumstearaat
pl: E571, Stearynian amonu
pt: E571, Estearato de amónio
ro: E571, Stearat de amoniu
ru: E571, Стеарат аммония
sk: E571, Stearát amónny
sl: E571, Amonijev stearat
sq: E571, Stearat Amonijum
sr: E571, Амонијум стеарат
sv: E571, Ammoniumstearat
th: E571, สเตียเรตแอมโมเนียม
tr: E571, Amonyum stearat
uk: E571, Стеарат амонію
vi: E571, Amoni stearat
zh: E571, 硬脂酸铵

en: E572, Magnesium stearate
xx: E572
ar: E572, ستيرات المغنسيوم
bg: E572, Магнезиев стеарат
ca: E572, Estereat de magnesi
cs: E572, Stearan hořečnatý, Hořečnatá sůl kyseliny oktadekanové, Oktadekanoát hořečnatý, Stearát hořečnatý
de: E572, Magnesiumstearat
es: E572, Estereato de magnesio
fa: E572, منیزیم استارات
fi: E572, Magnesiumstearaatti, Magnesiumstearaatti
fr: E572, Stéarate de magnésium, C36H70MgO4
hr: E572, magnezijum-stearat, magnezijev-stearat
hu: E572, Magnézium-sztearát
it: E572, Stearato di magnesio, C36H70MgO4
nl: E572, Magnesiumstearaat
pl: E572, Stearynian magnezu
pt: E572, Estearato de magnésio
ro: E572, Stearat de magneziu
ru: E572, Стеарат магния
sh: E572, Magnezijum stearat
zh: E572, 硬脂酸镁

en: E573, Aluminium stearate, Aluminum stearate
xx: E573
af: E573, Aluminiumstearaat
ar: E573, ستيرات الألومنيوم
az: E573, Alüminium stearat
bg: E573, Алуминиев стеарат
ca: E573, Estearat d'alumini
cs: E573, Hlinitý stearát
da: E573, Aluminiumstearat
de: E573, Aluminiumstearat
el: E573, Στεατικό αργιλίου
eo: E573, Aluminia stearato
es: E573, Estearato de aluminio
et: E573, Alumiiniumstearaat
fa: E573, آلومینیوم استئارات
fi: E573, Alumiinistearaatti, Alumiinistearaattia
fr: E573, Stéarate d'aluminium
gl: E573, Estearato de aluminio
he: E573, אלומיניום סטארט
hi: E573, एल्यूमिनियम स्टीयरेट
hr: E573, Aluminijev stearat
hu: E573, Alumínium-sztearát
id: E573, Aluminium stearat
it: E573, Stearato di alluminio
ja: E573, ステアリン酸アルミニウム
ko: E573, 스테아르산 알루미늄
lt: E573, Aliuminio stearatas
lv: E573, Alumīnija stearāts
mk: E573, Алуминиум стеарат
mt: E573, Stearat tal-aluminju
nl: E573, Aluminiumstearaat
pl: E573, Stearynian glinu
pt: E573, Estearato de alumínio
ro: E573, Stearat de aluminiu
ru: E573, Стеарат алюминия
sk: E573, Stearát hlinitý
sl: E573, Aluminijev stearat
sq: E573, Stearat alumini
sr: E573, Алуминијум стеарат
sv: E573, Aluminiumstearat
th: E573, อะลูมิเนียมสเตียเรต
tr: E573, Alüminyum stearat
uk: E573, Стеарат алюмінію
vi: E573, Nhôm stearat
zh: E573, 硬脂酸铝

en: E574, Gluconic acid, D-gluconic acid
xx: E574
bg: E574, Глюконова киселина, D-глюконова киселина
ca: E574, Àcid glucònic, acid gluconic
cs: E574, Kyselina glukonová
da: E574, Gluconsyre
de: E574, Gluconsäure, D-Gluconsäure, Glukonsäure, E 574, Gluconat, Dextronsäure
el: E574, Γλυκονικο οξυ, D-γλυκονικό οξύ
es: E574, Ácido glucónico, Ácido D-glucónico, Ácido dextronico, Ácido glicogénico
et: E574, Glükoonhape
fi: E574, Glukonihappo, Glukonihappoa
fr: E574, Acide gluconique, Acide D-gluconique, C6H12O7, Gluconate, E 574, 526-95-4
hu: E574, Glükonsav, D-Glükonsav
it: E574, Acido gluconico, Acido D-gluconico, Gluconato, C6H12O7
lt: E574, Gliukono rūgštis, D-gliukono rūgštis
lv: E574, Glikonskābe, D-glikonskābe
mt: E574, Aċidu glukoniku, Aċidu D-glukoniku
nl: E574, Gluconzuur, D-gluconzuur
pl: E574, Kwas glukonowy, Kwas D-glukonowy
pt: E574, Ácido glucónico, Ácido D-glucónico, Gluconato, Ácido glicônico
ro: E574, Acid gluconic, Acid D-gluconic
sk: E574, Kyselina glukónová, kyselina D-glukónová
sl: E574, Glukonska kislina, D–glukonska kislina
sv: E574, Glukonsyra, D-Glukonsyra

en: E575, Glucono-delta-lactone, Gluconolactone, GDL, D-Gluconic acid delta-lactone
xx: E575
bg: E575, Глюконо-делта-лактон
ca: E575, Delta-gluconolactona, δ-gluconolactona
cs: E575, Glukono-delta-lakton, Glukonolakton, GDL, δ-lakton kyseliny D-glukonové
da: E575, Glucono-delta-lacton, Gluconolacton, D-gluconsyre-δ-lacton
de: E575, Glucono-delta-lacton, Gluconolacton, GDL, D-Gluconsäure-δ-lacton, Glucono-1\,5-lacton
el: E575, Γλυκονο-δ-λακτονη, Γλυκονολακτόνη, GDL, δ-λακτόνη D-γλυκονικού οξέος
es: E575, Glucono-delta-lactona
et: E575, Glükoondeltalaktoon, D-glükoon-1\,5-laktoon
fa: E575, گلوکونو دلتا-لاکتون
fi: E575, Glukono-delta-laktoni, Glukonolaktoni, GDL, D-glukonihappo-delta-laktoni, Glukono-delta-laktonia, Glukonolaktonia, D-glukonihappo-delta-laktonia
fr: E575, Glucono-delta-lactone, Gluconodeltalactone, Gluconolactone, GDL, Delta-gluconolactone
ga: E575, glúcón-deilte-lachtón
hr: E575, glukono-delta-lakton
hu: E575, Glükono-delta-lakton, Glükono-lakton, GDL, D-Glükonsav-delta-lakton
it: E575, Gluconedeltalattone
ja: E575, グルコノラクトン
lt: E575, Gliukono-delta-laktonas
lv: E575, Glikonskābes delta-laktons, Glikonolaktons, GDL, D-glikonskābes delta-laktons
mt: E575, Glukono-delta-latton
nb: E575, glukonsyrans deltalakton
nl: E575, Glucono-delta-lacton, Gluconolacton, GDL, D-gluconzuur-delta-lacton
pl: E575, Lakton kwasu glukonowego, Glukonolakton
pt: E575, Glucono-delta-lactona
ro: E575, Glucono-delta-lactonă, Gluconolactonă, GDL, Acid D-gluconic delta-lactonă
sh: E575, Glukonolakton
sk: E575, Glukóno-delta-laktón
sl: E575, Glukonodelta lakton
sr: E575, глуконолактон
sv: E575, Glukonsyrans deltalakton, Glukonolakton, GDL, D-glukonsyrans deltalakton
vi: E575, Glucono delta-lacton
zh: E575, 葡萄糖酸内酯

en: E576, Sodium gluconate
xx: E576
bg: E576, Натриев глюконат
ca: E576, Gluconat de sodi
cs: E576, Glukonan sodný
da: E576, Natriumgluconat
de: E576, Natriumgluconat
el: E576, Γλυκονικο νατριο
es: E576, Gluconato sódico, Gluconato de sodio
et: E576, Naatriumglükonaat
fi: E576, Natriumglukonaatti, Natriumglukonaattia
fr: E576, Gluconate de sodium
hu: E576, Nátrium-glükonát
it: E576, Gluconato di sodio
lt: E576, Natrio gliukonatas
lv: E576, Nātrija glikonāts
mt: E576, Glukonat tas-sodju
nl: E576, Natriumgluconaat
pl: E576, Glukonian sodu
pt: E576, Gluconato de sódio
ro: E576, Gluconat de sodiu
sk: E576, Glukonan sodný
sl: E576, Natrijev glukonat
sv: E576, Natriumglukonat

en: E577, Potassium gluconate
xx: E577
bg: E577, Калиев глюконат
ca: E577, Gluconat de potassi
cs: E577, Glukonan draselný
da: E577, Kaliumgluconat
de: E577, Kaliumgluconat
el: E577, Γλυκονικο καλιο
es: E577, Gluconato potásico
et: E577, Kaaliumglükonaat
fi: E577, Kaliumglukonaatti, Kaliumglukonaattia
fr: E577, Gluconate de potassium
hu: E577, Kálium-glükonát
it: E577, Gluconato di potassio
lt: E577, Kalio gliukonatas
lv: E577, Kālija glikonāts
mt: E577, Glukonat tal-potassju
nl: E577, Kaliumgluconaat
pl: E577, Glukonian potasu
pt: E577, Gluconato de potássio
ro: E577, Gluconat de potasiu
sk: E577, Glukonan draselný
sl: E577, Kalijev glukonat
sv: E577, Kaliumglukonat

en: E578, calcium gluconate
xx: E578
af: E578, Kalsiumglukonaat
ar: E578, غلوكونات الكالسيوم
az: E578, Kalsium qlükonat
bg: E578, Калциев глюконат
ca: E578, Gluconat de calci
cs: E578, Glukonát vápenatý, Glukonan vápenatý
cy: E578, calsiwm gluconad
de: E578, Calciumgluconat, Kalziumglukonat
el: E578, γλυκονικό ασβέστιο
eo: E578, kalcia glukonato
es: E578, Gluconato cálcico, Gluconato de calcio
et: E578, kaltsiumglükonaat
fa: E578, کلسیم گلوکونات
fi: E578, Kalsiumglukonaatti, Kalsiumglukonaattia
fr: E578, Gluconate de calcium, Pentahydroxyéthanoate de calcium, Gluconate calcique
hu: E578, kalcium-glükonát
it: E578, gluconato di calcio
ja: E578, グルコン酸カルシウム, グルコン酸Ca, グルコン酸Ｃａ
lt: E578, kalcio gliukonatas
lv: E578, kalcija glikonāts
mt: E578, glukonat tal-kalċju
nl: E578, calciumgluconaat
nn: E578, kalsiumglukonat
or: E578, କ୍ୟାଲସିଅମ ଗ୍ଲୁକୋନେଟ
pl: E578, Glukonian wapnia, calcio gluconato
pt: E578, gluconato de cálcio
ro: E578, gluconat de calciu
ru: E578, Глюконат кальция
sh: E578, Kalcijum glukonat
sk: E578, glukónan vápenatý
sl: E578, kalcijev glukonat
sr: E578, Kalcijum glukonat
sv: E578, kalciumglukonat
ta: E578, கால்சியம் குளுக்கோனேட்டு
uk: E578, Глюконат кальцію
vi: E578, canxi gluconat
zh: E578, 葡萄糖酸钙

en: E579, iron gluconate, ferrous gluconate
xx: E579
ar: E579, غلوكونات الحديد الثنائي
bg: E579, Феро глюконат
cs: E579, Glukonan železnatý
da: E579, Ferrogluconat
de: E579, Eisengluconat, Eisen(II)Gluconat, Eisen-II-gluconat
el: E579, Γλυκονικος σιδηρος
es: E579, Gluconato ferroso
et: E579, Ferroglükonaat
fa: E579, گلوکونات آهن
fi: E579, Ferroglukonaatti
fr: E579, gluconate de fer, gluconate ferreux
hr: E579
hu: E579, Vas-glukonát
it: E579, gluconato di ferro, Gluconato ferroso
lt: E579, Geležies gliukonatas
lv: E579, Dzelzs glikonāts
mt: E579, Glukonat ferruż
nl: E579, Ijzergluconaat
pl: E579, Glukonian żelazawy
pt: E579, Gluconato ferroso
ro: E579, Gluconat feros
ru: E579, глюконат железа
sh: E579, Gvožđe glukonat
sk: E579, Glukonan železnatý
sl: E579, Železov glukonat
sr: E579, Gvožđe glukonat
sv: E579, Järnglukonat
tr: E579, ferrous gluconate

en: E580, Magnesium Gluconate
xx: E580
af: E580, Magnesiumglukonaat
ar: E580, غلوكونات المغنيسيوم
az: E580, Maqnezium Qlükonat
bg: E580, Глюконат на магнезий
ca: E580, Gluconat de magnesi
cs: E580, Glukonát hořečnatý
da: E580, Magnesiumgluconat
de: E580, Magnesiumgluconat
el: E580, Γλυκονικό μαγνήσιο
eo: E580, Magnezia glukonato
es: E580, Gluconato de magnesio
et: E580, Magneesiumglükonaat
fa: E580, گلوکونات منیزیم
fi: E580, Magnesiumglukonaatti, Magnesiumglukonaattia
fr: E580, Gluconate de magnésium
hr: E580, Magnezijev glukonat, Glukonat magnezija
hu: E580, Magnézium-glükonát
id: E580, Magnesium glukonat
it: E580, Gluconato di magnesio
ja: E580, グルコン酸マグネシウム
ko: E580, 글루 콘산 마그네슘
lt: E580, Magnio gliukonatas
lv: E580, Magnija glikonāts
mt: E580, Glukonat tal-maġnezju
nl: E580, Magnesiumgluconaat
pl: E580, Glukonian magnezu
pt: E580, Gluconato de magnésio
ro: E580, Gluconat de magneziu
ru: E580, Глюконат магния
sk: E580, Glukonát horečnatý
sl: E580, Magnezijev glukonat
sq: E580, Glukonat magnezi
sv: E580, Magnesiumglukonat
th: E580, กลูโคเนตแมกนีเซียม
tr: E580, Magnezyum glukonat
uk: E580, Глюконат магнію
vi: E580, Magie gluconat
zh: E580, 葡萄糖酸镁

en: E585, Ferrous lactate, Iron-II lactate
xx: E585
bg: E585, Феро лактат, желязо-II лактат
ca: E585, Lactat ferrós, lactat ferros
cs: E585, Mléčnan železnatý
da: E585, Ferrolactat, Jern-II-lactat
de: E585, Eisen-ii-lactat, Eisenlactat
el: E585, Γαλακτικος σιδηρος, Γαλακτικός σίδηρος-II
es: E585, Lactato ferroso, Lactato de hierro-II
et: E585, Ferrolaktaat
fa: E585, لاکتات آهن-II
fi: E585, Ferrolaktaatti, Rauta-II-laktaatti, Ferrolaktaattia, Rauta-II-laktaattia
fr: E585, Lactate ferreux, Lactate de fer-II
hu: E585, Vas-ii-laktát, Vas-laktát
it: E585, Lattato ferroso
ja: E585, 乳酸鉄-II
lt: E585, Geležies laktatas, Geležies-II-laktatas
lv: E585, Dzelzs laktāts, Dzelzs-II-laktāts
mt: E585, Lattat ferruż, Lattat tal-ħadid-II-
nl: E585, IJzer-ii-lactaat, IJzer-II-dilactaat
pl: E585, Mleczan żelazawy, Mleczan żelaza-II-
pt: E585, Lactato ferroso, Lactato de ferro-II
ro: E585, Lactat feros, Lactat de fier-II
sk: E585, Mliečnan železnatý
sl: E585, Železov-ii-laktat
sr: E585, Gvožđe-II laktat
sv: E585, Järnlaktat, Järn-II-laktat
vi: E585, Sắt-II lactat

en: E586, 4-hexylresorcinol, 4-Hexyl-1\,3-benzenediol
xx: E586
bg: E586, 4-хексилрезорцинол, 4-хексил-1\,3-бензендиол
ca: E586, 4-hexilresorcinol
cs: E586, 4-hexylresorcinol
da: E586, 4-hexylresorcinol, 4-Hexyl-1\,3-benzendiol
de: E586, 4-hexylresorcin, 4-Hexylbenzen-1\,3-diol
el: E586, 4-εξυλορεσορκινολη, 4-εξυλοβενζολοδιόλη-1\,3
es: E586, 4-hexilresorcinol, 4-hexil-1\,3-bencenodiol
et: E586, 4-heksüülresortsinool, 4-heksüül-1\,3-benseendiool
fi: E586, 4-heksyyliresorsinoli, 4-Heksyyli-1\,3-bentseenidioli, 4-heksyyliresorsinolia, 4-Heksyyli-1\,3-bentseenidiolia
fr: E586, Héxylresorcinol, 4-hexylrésorcinol
hu: E586, 4-hexil-rezorcin, 4-Hexil-1\,3-benzoldiol
it: E586, 4-esilresorcinolo, 4-Esil-1\,3-benzendiolo
lt: E586, 4-heksilrezorcinolis, 4-heksil-1\,3-benzendiolas
lv: E586, 4-heksilrezorcīns, 4-heksil-1\,3-benzdiols
mt: E586, 4-eżilresorċinol, 4-Eżil-1\,3-benżendiol
nl: E586, 4-hexylresorcinol, 4-Hexyl-1\,3-benzeendiol
pl: E586, 4-heksylorezorcynol, 4-heksyl-1\,3-benzenodiol
pt: E586, 4-hexilresorcinol, 4-Hexil-1\,3-benzenodiol
ro: E586, 4-hexilrezorcinol, 4-hexil-1\,3-benzendiol
sk: E586, 4-hexylrezorcinol, 4-hexyl-1\,3-benzéndiol
sl: E586, 4-heksilresorcinol, 4-heksil-1\,3-benzendiol
sv: E586, 4-hexylresorcinol, 4-Hexyl-1\,3-bensendiol

en: E620, Glutamic acid, L-Glutamic acid
xx: E620
bg: E620, Глутаминова киселина, L-глутаминова киселина, Глутамат
ca: E620, Àcid glutàmic, acid glutamic
cs: E620, Kyselina glutamová, Kyselina L-glutamová, kyselina 2-aminoglutarová, E 620, L-glutamát
da: E620, Glutaminsyre, L-Glutaminsyre, Glutamat, E-620
de: E620, Glutaminsäure, L-Glutaminsäure, E 620
el: E620, Γλουταμινικο οξυ, L-γλουταμινικό οξύ
es: E620, Ácido glutámico, Ácido L-glutámico, E 620
et: E620, Glutamiinhape, L-glutamiinhape
fi: E620, Glutamiinihappo, L-glutamiinihappo, E 620, 2-aminopentaanidihappo, Glutamaatti, Glutamiinihappoa, L-glutamiinihappoa, 2-aminopentaanidihappoa, Glutamaattia
fr: E620, Acide glutamique, Acide L-glutamique, Acide (S)-2-aminopentanedioïque, 6893-26-1, 617-65-2, Acide 2-aminopentanedioïque, Glutamatergique, 56-86-0, Acide glumatique
hu: E620, Glutaminsav, L-Glutaminsav
it: E620, Acido glutammico, L-acido glutammico, Acido L-glutammico, Acido L-α-amminoglutarico, C5H9NO4
lt: E620, Glutamo rūgštis, L-glutamo rūgštis, Gliutamatas, Gliutamininė rūgštis, Glutamininė rūgštis, Glutamatas
lv: E620, Glutamīnskābe, L-glutamīnskābe, C5h9no4, Glutamāti
mt: E620, Aċidu glutamiku, Aċidu L-glutamiku
nl: E620, Glutaminezuur, L-Glutaminezuur
pl: E620, Kwas glutaminowy, Kwas L-glutaminowy, Glutaminian
pt: E620, Ácido glutâmico, Ácido L-glutâmico
ro: E620, Acid glutamic, Acid L-glutamic, Glutamat
sk: E620, Kyselina glutamová, Kyselina L-glutamová, E 620, L-glutamát, Glutamát
sl: E620, Glutaminska kislina, L-glutaminska kislina, Glutamat
sv: E620, Glutaminsyra, L-glutaminsyra, Glutamat, E 620

en: E621, Monosodium glutamate, monosodium l-glutamate, Sodium glutamate, L-Glutamic acid\, monosodium salt, Glutamate, MSG Fine
xx: E621, E 621, E-621, MSG
ar: E621, غلوتامات أحادي الصوديوم
be: E621, Глутамат натрыю
bg: E621, Мононатриев глутамат, Натриев глутамат, Мононатриев глутаминат, Натриев глутаминат
ca: E621, Glutamat de monosodi
cs: E621, Glutaman sodný, Glutamát sodný, L-glutamát sodný monohydrát, Glutasol, L-glutaman sodný, L-Glutaman sodný monohydrát, L-glutamát sodný, Glutaman, Glutamát
da: E621, Mononatriumglutamat, Tredje krydderi, Mononatriumglutaminat, 3. krydderi, Det tredje krydderi, Det 3. krydderi
de: E621, Mononatriumglutamat, Natriumglutamat
el: E621, Οξινο γλουταμινικο νατριο, Γλουταμινικό νάτριο
eo: E621, ununatria L-glutamato
es: E621, Glutamato monosódico, Glutamato de monosodio, Glutamato de sodio, Glutamato
et: E621, Naatriumvesinikglutamaat
fa: E621, مونوسدیم گلوتامات
fi: E621, Mononatriumglutamaatti, Natriumglutamaatti, Mononatriumglutamaattia, Natriumglutamaattia
fr: E621, Glutamate monosodique, glutamate de sodium, monoglutamate de sodium, monosodium glutamate, sodium glutamate, GMS, C5H8NNaO4, 6106-04-3, 142-47-2, Glutamate
ga: E621, Glútamáit aonsóidiam
he: E621, מונוסודיום גלוטמט
hi: E621, मोनोसोडियम ग्लूटामेट
hr: E621, mononatrijev glutaminat, mononatrijev glutamin, mononatrij glutaminat, mononatrij glutamat, natrijev glutaminat, pojačivač arome-mononatrij glutaminat, MONONATRIJEV GLUTAMAT
hu: E621, Mononátrium-glutamát, Nátrium-glutamát
id: E621, Mononatrium glutamat
it: E621, Glutammato di monosodio, Glutammato di sodio, Glutammato monosodico, NaC5NO4H8
ja: E621, L-グルタミン酸ナトリウム, L-グルタミン酸Na, Ｌーグルタミン酸Ｎａ, グルタミン酸ナトリウム, グルタミン酸Na, グルタミン酸Ｎａ
ko: E621, 글루탐산 나트륨
lt: E621, Mononatrio glutamatas, Natrio glutamatas
lv: E621, Mononātrija glutamāts, Nātrija glutamāts
ml: E621, അജിനോമോട്ടോ
mr: E621, मोनोसोडियम ग्लुटामेट
ms: E621, Monosodium glutamat
mt: E621, Glutamat monosodiku, Glutamat tas-sodju
my: E621, အချိုမှုန့်
nb: E621, Natriumglutamat
nl: E621, Mononatriumglutamaat, Natriumglutamaat, Vetsin, Ve tsin, smaakversterker E621
nn: E621, natriumglutamat
pl: E621, Glutaminian monosodowy, Glutaminian sodu
pt: E621, Glutamato monossódico, Glutamato de sódio, Glutamato
ro: E621, Glutamat monosodic, Glutamat de sodiu, Glumat de monosodiu
rs: E621, mononatrijum glutamat, mononatrijum-glutaminat, mononatrijum-glutamat, mononatrijum glutaminat
ru: E621, Глутамат натрия, Вэйцзин, Фе-цзин, Вейцзин, Глютамат натрия, Адзи-но-мото, Глутаминат натрия, глутамат натрия 1-замещенный, глутамат натрия 1 замещенный, усилитель вкуса и аромата e621, усилитель вкуса и аромата глутамат натрия
sh: E621, Mononatrijum glutamat
si: E621, මොනොසෝඩියම් ග්ලූටමේට්
sk: E621, Glutaman sodný, Glutaman sodný
sl: E621, Mononatrijev glutamat, natrijev glutamat, mononatrijevgluamat
sr: E621, Mononatrijum glutamat
su: E621, Monosodium glutamat
sv: E621, Mononatriumglutamat, Natriumglutamat, Monosodiumglutamat, Smaksalt, Weijing
ta: E621, மோனோ சோடியம் குளூட்டாமேட்
te: E621, మోనో సోడియం గ్లూటామేట్‌
th: E621, โมโนโซเดียมกลูตาเมต
tl: E621, Betsin
tr: E621, Monosodyum glutamat, mono sodyum glutamat
uk: E621, Глутамат натрію
ur: E621, چینی نمک
vi: E621, bột ngọt
zh: E621, 味精